apertium-uzb.uzb.lexc
LEXICON VERB-COPULA

%<cop%>: GERUND ;
!%<cop%>: PRES-CONT ;
%<cop%>: PRES-COND ;
!%<cop%>: INDEF-PAST ;
%<cop%>: PAST ;
!%<cop%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
!%<cop%>: NON-FINITE ;
!%<cop%>: KAN ;
%<cop%>%<aor%>: PERS ; 

!LEXICON KAN  
!
!%<kan%>:%>kan # ;
!%<kan%>%<neg%>:%>kansiz # ;

LEXICON NON-FINITE

! FIXME: more <neg> forms

%<ger_inf%>:%>maq GER-INFL ; !Dir/LR !are we sure -moq is the standard form? my grammar book gives -maq as the standard but it‘s better if a native decides this
%<ger_inf%>:%>moq GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abst%>:%>%{i%}sh GER-INFL ;
%<ger_pres%>:%>%{a%}yotgan GER-INFL ;


%<gna_perf%>:%>%{i%}b # ;
%<gna_when%>:%>gach # ;     ! FIXME: rename
%<gna_neg%>:%>masdan # ;    ! FIXME: rename

%<gpr_rsub%>:%>%{G%}an # ;

%<gpr_pres%>:%>%{a%}yotgan # ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{a%}digan # ;
%<gpr_fut_plan%>:%>moqchi # ; !what is the negative form? !the negative form is constructed with emas, so might be better to handle lexically, like bormoqchi emasman = gidecek değilim
! This isn't a negative form of gpr (глаголное прилагательное); it's the negative form of a finite form.  This is like "bir yerga barmoqchi kishi" (is this correct?) -JNW

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{a%}r # ; 
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>mas # ; 

!%<part%>:%>ing SUBST ; 

%<prc_perf%>:%>%{i%}b # ;
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ;
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>ma%>%{E%} # ;

%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}i V-PERS-VOL ;

LEXICON PRES-COND 

%<gna_cond%>:%>sa PERS2 ;


LEXICON GERUND 

%<ger%>:%>%{u%}v GER-INFL ; 
%<neg%>%<ger%>:%>ma%>%{u%}v GER-INFL ; 

%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}an GER-INFL ;    
%<neg%>%<ger_past%>:%>ma%>%{G%}an GER-INFL ;

!%<ger_past%>:%>ish SUBST ;    

%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}digan GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_impf%>:%>ma%>%{E%}digan GER-INFL ;


LEXICON IMPERATIVE
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{E%}y # ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{E%}yin # ; !Dir/LR

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>gin # ; !Dir/LR

%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>sin # ;

%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}ylik # ;

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}ng # ; !Dir/LR
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}ngiz # ; 
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}nglar # ; !Dir/LR

%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>sinlar # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%[%+p3pl%]%>sin # ;  ! Dir/LR


%<imp%>:%>gay PERS ; ! Dir/LR !archaic/literary form: tila-gay-man

LEXICON INDEF-PAST

%<past%>:%>%{G%}an V-PERS-S1 ;
%<past%>+e%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>%{G%}an%>di PERS2 ;
%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{i%}b PERS3 ;


LEXICON PAST

%<ifi%>:%>di PERS2 ;
!%<ifi%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}sh%>di CLITICS ;   ! Dir/LR

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-PAST

%<past%>%<evid%>:%>mish PERS ;

!LEXICON PERMISSIVE
!
!%<perm%>:%>sin # ; 

LEXICON PRES-CONT 

%<prog%>:%>yap PERS ;       ! Dir/LR
%<prog%>:%>yab PERS ;       ! Dir/LR
%<prog%>:%>%{i%}yab PERS ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prog%>:%>%{a%}yab PERS ;
%<prog_inf%>:%>moqda V-PERS-S1 ;
%<prog_inf%>:%>maqda V-PERS-S1 ; ! Dir/LR
%<prog_fut%>:%>%{E%}yatir V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON AORIST

%<aor%>:%>%{E%} PERS3 ;
%<fut2%>:%>%{E%}r PERS3 ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME: need a different tag for this?

LEXICON FUT
%<fut%>:%>%{E%}digan V-PERS-S1 ;
%<fut%>:%>%{E%}ajak V-PERS-S1 ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME: need a different tag for this?
%<fut_plan%>:%>moqchi V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-INFL-ABIL

%<prc_impf%>+ol%<vaux%>:%>ol V-AUX ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

! Pointed to by: V-PERS-S1 and V-PERS-AOR
! Irregular p1.sg form is in V-PERS-AOR

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>man CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>san CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>miz CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>silar CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>siz CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>sizlar CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:dir CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! #CHECK shouldn‘t this have -l{a}r to avoid ambiguity?
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%[%+p3pl%] CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:dir CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ng CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ngd%{A%}r CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%[%+p3pl%] CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Dir/LR

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ng%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>ng%{I%}zl%{A%}r CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PERS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>man  CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>san  CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>siz CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}i  CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>di  CLITICS ;     ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLITICS ;       ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>silar CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>sizlar CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>miz  CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{D%}ilar  CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%[%+p3pl%]%>%{D%}i  CLITICS ;  ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PERS2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ng  CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:  CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ning  CLITICS ; !Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ngiz  CLITICS ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ngizlar CLITICS ; !Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>lar  CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%[%+p3pl%]  CLITICS ;    ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PERS3 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>man  CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>san  CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>siz CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}i  CLITICS ;
! %<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLITICS ;

%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>miz  CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>silar CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>sizlar CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{D%}ilar CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%[%+p3pl%]%>%{D%}i CLITICS ;   ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADV1
%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV3

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; !  CASES ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: #;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT 

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

%<prn%>%<ref%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON PRON-ADV 

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE-NONOM ; 
%<prn%>%<adv%>:  POSS-REAL-NONOM ; 

LEXICON MIST

%<mistake%>: # ;

LEXICON CLITICS

%+mi%<qst%>:mi # ;
%+ki%<cnjadv%>:ki # ;
%+da%<cnjcoo%>:da # ; ! ""
%+dek%<post%>:dek # ; ! x gibi
%+day%<post%>:day # ; ! x gibi
%+cha%<post%>:cha # ; ! x kadar
# ; 

LEXICON OTHER-CLITICS

%+cha%<post%>:cha # ; ! x kadar

LEXICON CLIT-QST-MI

%+mi%<qst%>:%>mi # ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST
!QST ;
CLIT-QST-MI ;
%+mekan%<qst%>:% %{M%}ekan # ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODASS

%+go%<mod%>:% go # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GHANA-ETC

!%+%-ak%<postadv%>:%-ak # ; ! ""
%+gana%<postadv%>:% %{G%}ana # ; ! ""
%+da%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+da%<postadv%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+e%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-S1 ;
OTHER-CLITICS ;

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
# ;

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST

CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP         ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>ning CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}a CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>ni CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>dan CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>da CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>: POSSESSIVES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON Common
al:al MIST ; ! ""
ana:ana ADV1 ; ! "there"
ana:ana DET-DEM ; ! 
aniq:aniq ADV2 ; ! "evidently"
ancha:ancha ADV1 ; ! "quite, much"
arang:arang ADV2 ; ! "hard"
asosan:asosan ADV2 ; ! "chiefly"
asta%-sekin:asta%-sekin  ADV3 ; ! "slowly"
axtarish:axtarish ADV3 ; ! "afterwards"
aqlli:aqlli ADV2 ; ! "smartly"
ba:ba MIST ; !!
bajo:bajo ADV3 ; ! "with pleasure"
barcha:barcha DET-DEM ; ! "every"
battar:battar ADV1 ; ! "more"
bir:bir DET-IND ; ! "a"
biron:biron DET-IND ; ! "some kind of"
birga:birga ADV3 ; ! "together" !
birinchidan:birinchidan ADV2 ; ! "firstly"
birmuncha:birmuncha ADV1 ; !
biroz:biroz ADV2 ; ! "slightly"
biron:biron DET-DEM ; ! "some"
bosqichmabosqich:bosqichmabosqich ADV2 ; ! "gradually"
boshlab:boshlab ADV1 ; ! "at the begenning"
bugun:bugun ADV3 ; ! "today"
butun:butun DET-QNT ; ! "all of it"
v:v MIST ; 
ga:ga MIST ; ! ""
darrov:darrov ADV1; ! "immediately"              
d:d MIST ; 
dek:dek ADV1 ; !
doim:doim ADV1 ; ! "always"
har% doim:har% doim ADV3 ; ! "always"
yoqligida:yoqligida ADV2 ; ! "inabsentia"
yomon:yomon ADV3 ; ! "poorly"
yetarlicha:yetarlicha ADV3 ; ! "enough"
yoxud:yoxud ADV1 ; ! "or"
jiddiy:jiddiy ADV2 ; ! "philosophically"
juda:juda ADV3 ; ! "very"
zan:zan MIST ; ! ""
ziyod:ziyod ADV1 ; ! "in excess (of)"
zi:zi MIST ; ! ""
zudlik% bilan:zudlik% bilan ADV3 ; ! "quickly"
i:i MIST ; 
ikkala:ikkala PRON-QNT ; !
ikki:ikki PRON-QNT ; !
imkon% qadar:imkon% qadar ADV1 ; ! "As much as possible"
ir:ir MIST ; !!
kamida:kamida ADV1 ; ! "at least"
kecha:kecha ADV3 ; ! "yesterday"
kech:kech ADV2 ; ! "late",
koʻpincha:koʻpincha ADV1 ; ! "usually"
koʻplab:koʻplab DET-QNT ; ! "hundreds"
qayerga:qayerga ADV-ITG ; ! "where to (куда)"
qayerda:qayerda ADV-ITG ; ! "where (где)"
qayerdan:qayerdan ADV-ITG ; ! "where from (откуда)"
qay:qay DET-ITG ; ! ""
qaysi:qaysi DET-ITG ; ! "which"
qaytadan:qaytadan ADV1 ; ! "once more"
qanday:qanday ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
qancha:qancha DET-QNT ; ! "how many"
qachon:qachon ADV-ITG ; ! "when"
qisman:qisman ADV2 ; ! "partly" "tolerable"
q:q MIST ; 
la:la MIST ; ! ""
lari:lari MIST ; ! ""
larning:larning MIST ; ! ""
le:le MIST ; ! ""
l:l MIST ; ! ""
ma:ma MIST ; !!
maxsus:maxsus ADV1 ; !
me:me MIST ; ! ""
minglab:minglab DET-QNT ; ! "thousands"
naqadar:naqadar ADV-ITG ; ! "how much"
ng:ng MIST ; ! ""
nega:nega ADV-ITG ; ! 0.9999882284017634
necha:necha DET-QNT ; ! " how many"
nechta:nechta DET-QNT ; ! 
nimaga:nimaga ADV-ITG ; ! "why"
nima% uchun:nima% uchun ADV-ITG ; ! "why, what for"
ni:ni MIST ; ! ""
oʻz:oʻz PRON-REF ; ! "self"
oʻnlab:oʻnlab DET-QNT ; ! "tens of", "dozens of"
oʻnminglab:oʻnminglab DET-QNT ; ! "tens of thousands"
yuzminglab:yuzminglab DET-QNT ; ! "hundreds of thousands"
millionlab:millionlab DET-QNT ; ! "millions"
milliardlab:milliardlab DET-QNT ; ! "billions"
oʻrtacha:oʻrtacha ADV1 ; ! "average"
oldin:oldin ADV1 ; !
u% yer:u% yer PRON-ADV ; ! "there"
bu% yer:bu% yer PRON-ADV ; ! "here"
shu% yer:shu% yer PRON-ADV ; ! "here"
uyoq:uyoq PRON-ADV ; ! "there"
buyoq:buyoq PRON-ADV ; ! "here"
shuyoq:shuyoq PRON-ADV ; ! "there"
orqaga:orqaga ADV2 ; ! "backwards"
orqa:orqa ADV2 ; ! "back" (inverted?)
ortiq:ortiq ADV3 ; ! "no more"
past:past ADV2 ; ! "low"               
po:po MIST ; ! ""
ra:ra MIST ; !!
rasman:rasman ADV1 ; !
r:r MIST ; 
sezilarli:sezilarli ADV2 ; ! "palpably"
tayyorgarliksiz:tayyorgarliksiz ADV2 ; ! "impromptu"
takroran:takroran ADV1 ; ! "again"
tez:tez ADV2 ; ! "fast"
teskarisiga:teskarisiga ADV1 ; ! "backwards"
to:to MIST ; ! ""
umuman:umuman ADV1 ; ! "in general"
aynanuddi ADV3 ; ! "nearly"
xususan:xususan ADV1 ; ! "particularly"
haqiqatda:haqiqatda ADV2 ; ! "de facto"
hali:hali ADV3 ; ! "a while ago"
haliyam:haliyam ADV3 ; ! "still"
hamma:hamma DET-QNT ; ! "all of them"
hamma:hamma PRON-QNT ; !
har% qanday:har% qanday DET-IND ; ! ""
har:har DET-QNT ; ! "each"
hozirgacha:hozirgacha ADV1 ; !
hozir:hozir ADV3 ; ! "now"
hoz:hoz MIST ; ! ""
chin%qalbdan:chin%qalbdan ADV2 ; ! "sincerely"
shubhasiz:shubhasiz ADV2 ; ! "indubitably"
shunday:shunday ADV3 ; ! "in that way"
sh:sh MIST ; ! ""
eng:eng ADV3 ; ! "the most"
endi:endi ADV3 ; ! "now"
yuzlab:yuzlab DET-QNT ; ! "hundreds"
yaqqol:yaqqol ADV1 ; ! "clearly"
yana:yana ADV3; ! "again"
LEXICON Proper
boshqa:boshqa DET-IND ; ! "another"
biroz:biroz DET-IND ; ! "some"
boʻlib:boʻlib DET-IND ; ! ""
shunday:shunday DET-IND ; ! "such"
birgina:birgina DET-IND ; ! "alone"
barcha:barcha DET-DEM ; ! "all"
bu:bu DET-DEM ; ! "this"
u:u DET-DEM ; ! "he/she/it"
boʻldi% shu:boʻldi% shu DET-DEM ; ! "that's it"  ! FIXME: CHECK
shu:shu DET-DEM ; ! "that"
ushbu:ushbu DET-DEM ; ! "this"
butun:butun DET-DEM ; ! "whole"
ayni:ayni DET-DEM ; ! "same"
aynan:aynan DET-DEM ; ! "same"
boshqa:boshqa DET-DEM ; ! "another"
